Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.010

When pleadings take place.

The pleadings in justice's court shall take place upon the appearance of the parties, unless they shall have been previously filed or unless the justice shall, for good cause shown, allow a longer time than the time of appearance.

[Code 1881 s 1756; 1873 p 344 s 55; 1854 p 231 s 43; RRS s 1778.]